Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1151.6] Parking; control by
department. (a) The department may adopt rules in accordance with chapter
91 to govern the traffic and parking conditions on roadways and other areas
under the jurisdiction of the department.

(b) The department, in accordance with chapter
91, may:

(1) Assess fees for parking on roadways and in
parking areas under the jurisdiction of the department; and

(2) Adopt rules relating to the assessment and
collection of fees for parking specified in this section.

(c) Fees collected under this section shall be
deposited into the same fund into which fees and charges assessed and collected
by the department for the use of school facilities under section 302A-1148 are
deposited; provided that any parking fees assessed and collected by a school
shall be deposited to the credit of the school's nonappropriated local school
fund account.

(d) The department may contract with the
department of accounting and general services or a private entity to implement
this section. [L 2010, c 190, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next